New Jersey, session 221, A1569.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1991, c.83 (C.2C:20-2.1) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. In addition to any other disposition authorized by law, a person convicted under the provisions of this chapter of theft or unlawful taking of a motor vehicle shall be subject: (1)  For the first offense, to a penalty of $500, and the court, in its discretion, may suspend, revoke, or postpone the person's driving privileges for a period not to exceed one year; (2)  For a second offense, to a penalty of $750, and the court, in its discretion, may suspend, revoke, or postpone the person's driving privileges for a period not to exceed two years; and (3)  For a third or subsequent offense, to a penalty of $1,000, and the court, in its discretion, may suspend, revoke, or postpone the person's driving privileges for a period not to exceed 10 years. In deciding the duration of any suspension, revocation, or postponement of the person's driving privileges pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection, the court shall consider the circumstances of the theft or unlawful taking of the motor vehicle and whether the loss of driving privileges will result in extreme hardship and alternative means of transportation are not readily available. b.    The suspension or postponement of the person's license to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall commence on the day the sentence is imposed.  In the case of any person who at the time of the imposition of sentence is less than 17 years of age, the period of the suspension of driving privileges authorized pursuant to this section, including a suspension of the privilege of operating a motorized bicycle, shall commence on the day the sentence is imposed and shall run for a period as fixed by the court not to exceed one year for a first offense, two years for a second offense, or 10 years for a third offense calculated from the day after the day the person reaches the age of 17 years.  If the driving privilege of any person is under revocation, suspension, or postponement for a violation of any provision of this Title or Title 39 of the Revised Statutes at the time of any conviction or adjudication of delinquency for a violation of any offense defined in this chapter or chapter 36 of this Title, the revocation, suspension, or postponement period imposed pursuant to this section shall commence as of the date of termination of the existing revocation, suspension, or postponement. Upon conviction the court shall collect forthwith the New Jersey driver's licenses of the person and forward the license or licenses to the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission along with a report indicating the first and last day of the suspension or postponement period imposed by the court pursuant to this section. If the court is for any reason unable to collect the license or licenses of the person, the court shall forward a report of the conviction or adjudication of delinquency to be filed with the chief administrator.  That report shall include the complete name, address, date of birth, eye color, and sex of the person and shall indicate the first and last day of the suspension or postponement period imposed by the court pursuant to this section.  The court shall inform the person orally and in writing that if the person is convicted of personally operating a motor vehicle during the period of license suspension or postponement imposed pursuant to this section the person shall, upon conviction, be subject to the penalties set forth in R.S.39:3-40.  A person shall be required to acknowledge receipt of the written notice in writing. Failure to receive a written notice or failure to acknowledge in writing the receipt of a written notice shall not be a defense to a subsequent charge of a violation of R.S.39:3-40.  If the person is the holder of a driver's license from another jurisdiction, the court shall not collect the license but shall notify the director who shall notify the appropriate officials in the licensing jurisdiction. The court shall, however, in accordance with the provisions of this section, revoke the person's non-resident driving privileges in this State. c.    All penalties provided for in this section shall be collected as provided for the collection of fines and restitutions in section 3 of P.L.1979, c.396 (C.2C:46-4), and shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of N.J.S.2C:64-6 as if the collected monies were the proceeds of property forfeited pursuant to the provisions of chapter 64.  However, the distributed monies are to be used for law enforcement activities related to auto theft. d.    Notwithstanding the grade of the crime of theft pursuant to N.J.S.2C:20-2 or section 1 of P.L.1993, c.221 (C.2C:15-2), and in addition to any other penalty imposed for theft of a motor vehicle or carjacking, a person shall be guilty of a crime of the first degree if the person: (1) commits theft of a motor vehicle or carjacking; and (2) subsequently commits a crime or combination of crimes and offenses interdependent of or closely related to the theft of a motor vehicle or carjacking as part of a sequence of events that took place within a comparatively short period of time. (cf: P.L.2019, c.276, s.3) 2.  Section 4 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-18) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  (1)  The court may order, before trial, the detention of an eligible defendant charged with any crime, or any offense involving domestic violence as defined in subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19), enumerated in subsection a. of section 5 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-19), if the prosecutor seeks the pretrial detention of the eligible defendant under section 5 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-19) and after a hearing pursuant to  that section the court finds clear and convincing evidence that no amount of monetary bail, non-monetary conditions of pretrial release or combination of monetary bail and conditions would reasonably assure the eligible defendant's appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, and that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process. The court may also order the pretrial detention of an eligible defendant when the prosecutor moves for a pretrial detention hearing and the eligible defendant fails to rebut a presumption of pretrial detention that may be established for the crimes enumerated under subsection b. of section 5 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-19). (2)  For purposes of ordering the pretrial detention of an eligible defendant pursuant to this section and section 5 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-19) or pursuant to section 10 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-24), when determining whether no amount of monetary bail, non-monetary conditions or combination of monetary bail and conditions would reasonably assure the eligible defendant's appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, or that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process, the court may consider the amount of monetary bail only with respect to whether it will, by itself or in combination with non-monetary conditions, reasonably assure the eligible defendant's appearance in court when required. b.    Regarding the pretrial detention hearing moved for by the prosecutor, except for when an eligible defendant is charged with a crime set forth under paragraph (1) [or] , (2) , or (3) of subsection b. of section 5 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-19), there shall be a rebuttable presumption that some amount of monetary bail, non-monetary conditions of pretrial release or combination of monetary bail and conditions would reasonably assure the eligible defendant's appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, and that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process. c.    An eligible defendant may appeal an order of pretrial detention pursuant to the Rules of Court.  The appeal shall be heard in an expedited manner.  The eligible defendant shall be detained pending the disposition of the appeal. d.    If the court does not order the pretrial detention of an eligible defendant at the conclusion of the pretrial detention hearing under this section and section 5 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-19), the court shall order the release of the eligible defendant pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-17). (cf: P.L.2014, c.31, s.4) 3.  Section 5 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-19) is amended to read as follows: 5.  a.  A prosecutor may file a motion with the court at any time, including any time before or after an eligible defendant's release pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-17), seeking the pretrial detention of an eligible defendant for: (1)  any crime of the first or second degree enumerated under subsection d. of section 2 of P.L.1997, c.117 (C.2C:43-7.2); (2)  any crime for which the eligible defendant would be subject to an ordinary or extended term of life imprisonment; (3)  any crime if the eligible defendant has been convicted of two or more offenses under paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection; (4)  any crime enumerated under paragraph (2) of subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-2) or crime involving human trafficking pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2005, c.77 (C.2C:13-8) or P.L.2013, c.51 (C.52:17B-237 et al.) when the victim is a minor, or the crime of endangering the welfare of a child under N.J.S.2C:24-4; (5)  any crime enumerated under subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:43-6; (6)  any crime or offense involving domestic violence as defined in subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19); or (7)  any other crime for which the prosecutor believes there is a serious risk that: (a)  the eligible defendant will not appear in court as required; (b)  the eligible defendant will pose a danger to any other person or the community; or (c)  the eligible defendant will obstruct or attempt to obstruct justice, or threaten, injure, or intimidate, or attempt to threaten, injure or intimidate, a prospective witness or juror. b.    When a motion for pretrial detention is filed pursuant to subsection a. of this section, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the eligible defendant shall be detained pending trial because no amount of monetary bail, non-monetary condition or combination of monetary bail and conditions would reasonably assure the eligible defendant's appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, and that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process, if the court finds probable cause that the eligible defendant: (1)  committed murder pursuant to N.J.S.2C:11-3; [or] (2)  committed any crime for which the eligible defendant would be subject to an ordinary or extended term of life imprisonment; or (3)  committed subsequent, interdependent or closely related crimes following the commission of motor vehicle theft or carjacking in violation of subsection d. of section 1 of P.L.1991, c.83 (C.2C:20-2.1). c.    A court shall hold a hearing to determine whether any amount of monetary bail or non-monetary conditions or combination of monetary bail and conditions, including those set forth under subsection b. of section 3 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-17) will reasonably assure the eligible defendant's appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, and that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process. d.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the pretrial detention hearing shall be held no later than the eligible defendant's first appearance unless the eligible defendant, or the prosecutor, seeks a continuance.  If a prosecutor files a motion for pretrial detention after the eligible defendant's first appearance has taken place or if no first appearance is required, the court shall schedule the pretrial detention hearing to take place within three working days of the date on which the prosecutor's motion was filed, unless the prosecutor or the eligible defendant seeks a continuance.  Except for good cause, a continuance on motion of the eligible defendant may not exceed five days, not including any intermediate Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.  Except for good cause, a continuance on motion of the prosecutor may not exceed three days, not including any intermediate Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. (2)  Upon the filing of a motion by the prosecutor seeking the pretrial detention of the eligible defendant and during any continuance that may be granted by the court, the eligible defendant shall be detained in jail, unless the eligible defendant was previously released from custody before trial, in which case the court shall issue a notice to appear to compel the appearance of the eligible defendant at the detention hearing.  The court, on motion of the prosecutor or sua sponte, may order that, while in custody, an eligible defendant who appears to be a drug-dependent person receive an assessment to determine whether that eligible defendant is drug-dependent. e.  (1)  At the pretrial detention hearing, the eligible defendant has the right to be represented by counsel, and, if financially unable to obtain adequate representation, to have counsel appointed.  The eligible defendant shall be afforded an opportunity to testify, to present witnesses, to cross-examine witnesses who appear at the hearing, and to present information by proffer or otherwise.  The rules concerning admissibility of evidence in criminal trials shall not apply to the presentation and consideration of information at the hearing. (2)  In pretrial detention proceedings for which there is no indictment, the prosecutor shall establish probable cause that the eligible defendant committed the predicate offense.  A presumption of pretrial detention as provided in subsection b. of this section may be rebutted by proof provided by the eligible defendant, the prosecutor, or from other materials submitted to the court.  The standard of proof for a rebuttal of the presumption of pretrial detention shall be a preponderance of the evidence.  If proof cannot be established to rebut the presumption, the court may order the eligible defendant's pretrial detention.  If the presumption is rebutted by sufficient proof, the prosecutor shall have the opportunity to establish that the grounds for pretrial detention exist pursuant to this section. (3)  Except when an eligible defendant has failed to rebut a presumption of pretrial detention pursuant to subsection b. of this section, the court's finding to support an order of pretrial detention pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-18) that no amount of monetary bail, non-monetary conditions or combination of monetary bail and conditions will reasonably assure the eligible defendant's appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, and that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process shall be supported by clear and convincing evidence. f.     The hearing may be reopened, before or after a determination by the court, at any time before trial, if the court finds that information exists that was not known to the prosecutor or the eligible defendant at the time of the hearing and that has a material bearing on the issue of whether there are conditions of release that will reasonably assure the eligible defendant's appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, or that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process. g.    When a motion for pretrial detention is filed pursuant to subsection a. of this section, a pretrial recommendation of no release pursuant to subsection f. of section 6 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-20) may constitute prima facie evidence to overcome the presumption of release as set forth in subsection b. of section 4 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-18), if the court finds probable cause that the eligible defendant committed any crime for which the eligible defendant would be subject to a mandatory term of imprisonment pursuant to subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:43-6 for a crime involving the use or possession of a firearm other than a violation of: (1)  subsection a. or d. of N.J.S.2C:39-3; (2)  paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:39-4; (3)  subsection a. of section 1 of P.L. 1998, c.26 (C.2C:39-4.1); or (4) paragraph (1) of subsection b. or paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:39-5. (cf:  P.L.2022, c.43, s.1) 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.